src/srseng/resources/fst/eng2srs.lexc
< [ s t a r t %  r u n n i n g %  a g a i n "+V" "+I" "+Pfv" "+Rep" "+SbjSg4" ] : [ s o m e o n e %  s t a r t e d %  [ r u n n i n g | d r i v i n g ] %  s o m e w h e r e %  a g a i n %  a n d %  a g a i n ] > # ;
< [ a r r i v e %  b y %  r u n n i n g "+V" "+I" "+Ipfv" "+Rep" "+SbjSg1" ] : [ I %  a r r i v e %  b y %  [ r u n n i n g | d r i v i n g ] %  a g a i n %  a n d %  a g a i n ] > # ;
< [ a r r i v e %  b y %  r u n n i n g "+V" "+I" "+Ipfv" "+Rep" "+SbjSg2" ] : [ y o u %  a r r i v e %  b y %  [ r u n n i n g | d r i v i n g ] %  a g a i n %  a n d %  a g a i n ] > # ;
< [ a r r i v e %  b y %  r u n n i n g "+V" "+I" "+Ipfv" "+Rep" "+SbjSg3" ] : [ [ h e | s h e ] %  a r r i v e s %  b y %  [ r u n n i n g | d r i v i n g ] %  a g a i n %  a n d %  a g a i n ] > # ;
< [ a r r i v e %  b y %  r u n n i n g "+V" "+I" "+Pfv" "+Rep" "+SbjPl1" ] : [ w e %  a r r i v e d %  b y %  [ r u n n i n g | d r i v i n g ] %  a g a i n %  a n d %  a g a i n ] > # ;
< [ a r r i v e %  b y %  r u n n i n g "+V" "+I" "+Pfv" "+Rep" "+SbjPl2" ] : [ y o u %  a l l %  a r r i v e d %  b y %  [ r u n n i n g | d r i v i n g ] %  a g a i n %  a n d %  a g a i n ] > # ;
< [ a r r i v e %  b y %  r u n n i n g "+V" "+I" "+Pfv" "+Rep" "+SbjPl3" ] : [ t h e y %  a r r i v e d %  b y %  [ r u n n i n g | d r i v i n g ] %  a g a i n %  a n d %  a g a i n ] > # ;
< [ a r r i v e %  b y %  r u n n i n g "+V" "+I" "+Ipfv" "+Rep" "+SbjSg4" ] : [ s o m e o n e %  a r r i v e s %  b y %  [ r u n n i n g | d r i v i n g ] %  a g a i n %  a n d %  a g a i n ] > # ;
< [ m a k e %  r u n %  d r i v e %  l a t e r %  o n "+V" "+T" "+Ipfv" "+SbjSg1" "+DObjSg3" ] : [ I [ 0 | %  w i l l ] %  m a k e %  [ h i m | h e r ] %  [ r u n | d r i v e ] %  l a t e r %  o n ] > # ;
< [ m a k e %  r u n %  d r i v e %  l a t e r %  o n "+V" "+T" "+Ipfv" "+SbjSg2" "+DObjSg3" ] : [ y o u [ 0 | %  w i l l ] %  m a k e %  [ h i m | h e r ] %  [ r u n | d r i v e ] %  l a t e r %  o n ] > # ;
< [ m a k e %  r u n %  d r i v e %  l a t e r %  o n "+V" "+T" "+Ipfv" "+SbjSg3" "+DObjSg3" ] : [ [ h e | s h e ] [ 0 | %  w i l l ] %  m a k e %  [ h i m | h e r ] %  [ r u n | d r i v e ] %  l a t e r %  o n ] > # ;
< [ m a k e %  r u n %  d r i v e %  l a t e r %  o n "+V" "+T" "+Ipfv" "+SbjPl1" "+DObjSg3" ] : [ w e [ 0 | %  w i l l ] %  m a k e %  [ h i m | h e r ] %  [ r u n | d r i v e ] %  l a t e r %  o n ] > # ;
< [ m a k e %  r u n %  d r i v e %  l a t e r %  o n "+V" "+T" "+Ipfv" "+SbjPl2" "+DObjSg3" ] : [ y o u %  a l l [ 0 | %  w i l l ] %  m a k e %  [ h i m | h e r ] %  [ r u n | d r i v e ] %  l a t e r %  o n ] > # ;
< [ m a k e %  r u n %  d r i v e %  l a t e r %  o n "+V" "+T" "+Ipfv" "+SbjPl3" "+DObjSg3" ] : [ t h e y [ 0 | %  w i l l ] %  m a k e %  [ h i m | h e r ] %  [ r u n | d r i v e ] %  l a t e r %  o n ] > # ;
< [ m a k e %  r u n %  d r i v e %  l a t e r %  o n "+V" "+T" "+Ipfv" "+SbjSg4" "+DObjSg3" ] : [ s o m e o n e [ 0 | %  w i l l ] %  m a k e %  [ h i m | h e r ] %  [ r u n | d r i v e ] %  l a t e r %  o n ] > # ;
< [ r e a d %  s o m e t h i n g "+V" "+I" "+Ipfv" "+SbjSg1" ] : [ I %  a m %  r e a d i n g [ 0 | %  s o m e t h i n g ] ] > # ;
< [ r e a d %  s o m e t h i n g "+V" "+I" "+Ipfv" "+SbjSg2" ] : [ y o u %  a r e %  r e a d i n g [ 0 | %  s o m e t h i n g ] ] > # ;
< [ r e a d %  s o m e t h i n g "+V" "+I" "+Ipfv" "+SbjSg3" ] : [ [ h e | s h e ] %  i s %  r e a d i n g [ 0 | %  s o m e t h i n g ] ] > # ;
< [ r e a d %  s o m e t h i n g "+V" "+I" "+Ipfv" "+SbjPl1" ] : [ w e %  a r e %  r e a d i n g [ 0 | %  s o m e t h i n g ] ] > # ;
< [ r e a d %  s o m e t h i n g "+V" "+I" "+Ipfv" "+SbjPl2" ] : [ y o u %  a l l %  a r e %  r e a d i n g [ 0 | %  s o m e t h i n g ] ] > # ;
< [ r e a d %  s o m e t h i n g "+V" "+I" "+Ipfv" "+SbjPl3" ] : [ t h e y %  a r e %  r e a d i n g [ 0 | %  s o m e t h i n g ] ] > # ;
< [ r e a d %  s o m e t h i n g "+V" "+I" "+Ipfv" "+SbjSg4" ] : [ s o m e o n e %  i s %  r e a d i n g [ 0 | %  s o m e t h i n g ] ] > # ;
< [ r e a d "+V" "+T" "+Ipfv" "+SbjSg1" "+DObjSg3" ] : [ I %  a m %  r e a d i n g %  i t ] > # ;
< [ r e a d "+V" "+T" "+Ipfv" "+SbjSg2" "+DObjSg3" ] : [ y o u %  a r e %  r e a d i n g %  i t ] > # ;
< [ r e a d "+V" "+T" "+Ipfv" "+SbjSg3" "+DObjSg3" ] : [ [ h e | s h e ] %  i s %  r e a d i n g %  i t ] > # ;
< [ r e a d "+V" "+T" "+Ipfv" "+SbjPl1" "+DObjSg3" ] : [ w e %  a r e %  r e a d i n g %  i t ] > # ;
< [ r e a d "+V" "+T" "+Ipfv" "+SbjPl2" "+DObjSg3" ] : [ y o u %  a l l %  a r e %  r e a d i n g %  i t ] > # ;
< [ r e a d "+V" "+T" "+Ipfv" "+SbjPl3" "+DObjSg3" ] : [ t h e y %  a r e %  r e a d i n g %  i t ] > # ;
< [ r e a d "+V" "+T" "+Ipfv" "+SbjSg4" "+DObjSg3" ] : [ s o m e o n e %  i s %  r e a d i n g %  i t ] > # ;
< [ r e a d %  t h i s %  b o o k "+V" "+T" "+Ipfv" "+SbjSg1" "+DObjSg3" ] : [ I [ 0 | %  w i l l ] %  r e a d %  t h i s %  b o o k %  l a t e r %  o n ] > # ;
< [ r e a d %  t h i s %  b o o k "+V" "+T" "+Ipfv" "+SbjSg2" "+DObjSg3" ] : [ y o u [ 0 | %  w i l l ] %  r e a d %  t h i s %  b o o k %  l a t e r %  o n ] > # ;
< [ r e a d %  t h i s %  b o o k "+V" "+T" "+Ipfv" "+SbjSg3" "+DObjSg3" ] : [ [ h e | s h e ] [ 0 | %  w i l l ] %  r e a d %  t h i s %  b o o k %  l a t e r %  o n ] > # ;
< [ r e a d %  t h i s %  b o o k "+V" "+T" "+Ipfv" "+SbjPl1" "+DObjSg3" ] : [ w e [ 0 | %  w i l l ] %  r e a d %  t h i s %  b o o k %  l a t e r %  o n ] > # ;
< [ r e a d %  t h i s %  b o o k "+V" "+T" "+Ipfv" "+SbjPl2" "+DObjSg3" ] : [ y o u %  a l l %  a r e [ 0 | %  w i l l ] %  r e a d %  t h i s %  b o o k %  l a t e r %  o n ] > # ;
< [ r e a d %  t h i s %  b o o k "+V" "+T" "+Ipfv" "+SbjPl3" "+DObjSg3" ] : [ t h e y [ 0 | %  w i l l ] %  r e a d %  t h i s %  b o o k %  l a t e r %  o n ] > # ;
< [ r e a d %  t h i s %  b o o k "+V" "+T" "+Ipfv" "+SbjSg4" "+DObjSg3" ] : [ s o m e o n e [ 0 | %  w i l l ] %  r e a d %  t h i s %  b o o k %  l a t e r %  o n ] > # ;
< [ r e a d %  s o m e t h i n g "+V" "+I" "+Pfv" "+SbjSg1" ] : [ I %  h a v e %  r e a d [ 0 | %  s o m e t h i n g ] ] > # ;
< [ r e a d %  s o m e t h i n g "+V" "+I" "+Pfv" "+SbjSg2" ] : [ y o u %  h a v e %  r e a d [ 0 | %  s o m e t h i n g ] ] > # ;
< [ r e a d %  s o m e t h i n g "+V" "+I" "+Pfv" "+SbjSg3" ] : [ [ h e | s h e ] %  h a s %  r e a d [ 0 | %  s o m e t h i n g ] ] > # ;
< [ r e a d %  s o m e t h i n g "+V" "+I" "+Pfv" "+SbjPl1" ] : [ w e %  h a v e %  r e a d [ 0 | %  s o m e t h i n g ] ] > # ;
< [ r e a d %  s o m e t h i n g "+V" "+I" "+Pfv" "+SbjPl2" ] : [ y o u %  a l l %  h a v e %  r e a d [ 0 | %  s o m e t h i n g ] ] > # ;
< [ r e a d %  s o m e t h i n g "+V" "+I" "+Pfv" "+SbjPl3" ] : [ t h e y %  h a v e %  r e a d [ 0 | %  s o m e t h i n g ] ] > # ;
< [ r e a d %  s o m e t h i n g "+V" "+I" "+Pfv" "+SbjSg4" ] : [ s o m e o n e %  h a s %  r e a d [ 0 | %  s o m e t h i n g ] ] > # ;
< [ r e a d %  t h i s %  b o o k "+V" "+T" "+Pfv" "+SbjSg1" "+DObjSg3" ] : [ I %  h a v e %  r e a d %  t h i s %  b o o k ] > # ;
< [ r e a d %  t h i s %  b o o k "+V" "+T" "+Pfv" "+SbjSg2" "+DObjSg3" ] : [ y o u %  h a v e %  r e a d %  t h i s %  b o o k ] > # ;
< [ r e a d %  t h i s %  b o o k "+V" "+T" "+Pfv" "+SbjSg3" "+DObjSg3" ] : [ [ h e | s h e ] %  h a s %  r e a d %  t h i s %  b o o k ] > # ;
< [ r e a d %  t h i s %  b o o k "+V" "+T" "+Pfv" "+SbjPl1" "+DObjSg3" ] : [ w e %  h a v e %  r e a d %  t h i s %  b o o k ] > # ;
< [ r e a d %  t h i s %  b o o k "+V" "+T" "+Pfv" "+SbjPl2" "+DObjSg3" ] : [ y o u %  a l l %  h a v e %  r e a d %  t h i s %  b o o k ] > # ;
< [ r e a d %  t h i s %  b o o k "+V" "+T" "+Pfv" "+SbjPl3" "+DObjSg3" ] : [ t h e y %  h a v e %  r e a d %  t h i s %  b o o k ] > # ;
< [ r e a d %  t h i s %  b o o k "+V" "+T" "+Pfv" "+SbjSg4" "+DObjSg3" ] : [ s o m e o n e %  h a s %  r e a d %  t h i s %  b o o k ] > # ;
< [ r e a d "+V" "+T" "+Pfv" "+Rep" "+SbjSg1" "+DObjSg3" ] : [ I %  r e a d %  i t %  a g a i n %  a n d %  a g a i n ] > # ;
< [ r e a d "+V" "+T" "+Pfv" "+Rep" "+SbjSg2" "+DObjSg3" ] : [ y o u %  r e a d %  i t %  a g a i n %  a n d %  a g a i n ] > # ;
< [ r e a d "+V" "+T" "+Ipfv" "+Rep" "+SbjSg3" "+DObjSg3" ] : [ [ h e | s h e ] %  i s %  r e a d s %  i t %  a g a i n %  a n d %  a g a i n ] > # ;
< [ r e a d "+V" "+T" "+Pfv" "+Rep" "+SbjPl1" "+DObjSg3" ] : [ w e %  r e a d %  i t %  a g a i n %  a n d %  a g a i n ] > # ;
< [ r e a d "+V" "+T" "+Pfv" "+Rep" "+SbjPl2" "+DObjSg3" ] : [ y o u %  a l l %  r e a d %  i t %  a g a i n %  a n d %  a g a i n ] > # ;
< [ r e a d "+V" "+T" "+Pfv" "+Rep" "+SbjPl3" "+DObjSg3" ] : [ t h e y %  r e a d %  i t %  a g a i n %  a n d %  a g a i n ] > # ;
< [ r e a d "+V" "+T" "+Ipfv" "+Rep" "+SbjSg4" "+DObjSg3" ] : [ s o m e o n e %  r e a d s %  i t %  a g a i n %  a n d %  a g a i n ] > # ;
< [ b e %  s i c k "+V" "+I" "+Ipfv" "+SbjSg1" ] : [ I %  a m %  s i c k ] > # ;
< [ b e %  s i c k "+V" "+I" "+Ipfv" "+SbjSg2" ] : [ y o u %  a r e %  s i c k ] > # ;
< [ b e %  s i c k "+V" "+I" "+Ipfv" "+SbjSg3" ] : [ [ h e | s h e | i t ] %  i s %  s i c k ] > # ;
< [ b e %  s i c k "+V" "+I" "+Ipfv" "+SbjPl1" ] : [ w e %  a r e %  s i c k ] > # ;
< [ b e %  s i c k "+V" "+I" "+Ipfv" "+SbjPl2" ] : [ y o u %  a l l %  a r e %  s i c k ] > # ;
< [ b e %  s i c k "+V" "+I" "+Ipfv" "+SbjPl3" ] : [ t h e y %  a r e %  s i c k ] > # ;
< [ b e %  s i c k "+V" "+I" "+Ipfv" "+SbjSg4" ] : [ s o m e o n e %  i s %  s i c k ] > # ;
< [ b e %  s i c k %  a g a i n "+V" "+I" "+Ipfv" "+SbjSg1" ] : [ I %  a m %  s i c k %  a g a i n ] > # ;
< [ b e %  s i c k %  a g a i n "+V" "+I" "+Ipfv" "+SbjSg2" ] : [ y o u %  a r e %  s i c k %  a g a i n ] > # ;
< [ b e %  s i c k %  a g a i n "+V" "+I" "+Ipfv" "+SbjSg3" ] : [ [ h e | s h e ] %  i s %  s i c k %  a g a i n ] > # ;
< [ b e %  s i c k %  a g a i n "+V" "+I" "+Ipfv" "+SbjPl1" ] : [ w e %  a r e %  s i c k %  a g a i n ] > # ;
< [ b e %  s i c k %  a g a i n "+V" "+I" "+Ipfv" "+SbjPl2" ] : [ y o u %  a l l %  a r e %  s i c k %  a g a i n ] > # ;
< [ b e %  s i c k %  a g a i n "+V" "+I" "+Ipfv" "+SbjPl3" ] : [ t h e y %  a r e %  s i c k %  a g a i n ] > # ;
< [ b e %  s i c k %  a g a i n "+V" "+I" "+Ipfv" "+SbjSg4" ] : [ s o m e o n e %  i s %  s i c k %  a g a i n ] > # ;
< [ b e %  s t i l l %  s i c k %  t o d a y "+V" "+I" "+Ipfv" "+SbjSg1" ] : [ I %  a m %  s t i l l %  s i c k %  t o d a y ] > # ;
< [ b e %  s t i l l %  s i c k %  t o d a y "+V" "+I" "+Ipfv" "+SbjSg2" ] : [ y o u %  a r e %  s t i l l %  s i c k %  t o d a y ] > # ;
< [ b e %  s t i l l %  s i c k %  t o d a y "+V" "+I" "+Ipfv" "+SbjSg3" ] : [ [ h e | s h e ] %  i s %  s t i l l %  s i c k %  t o d a y ] > # ;
< [ b e %  s t i l l %  s i c k %  t o d a y "+V" "+I" "+Ipfv" "+SbjPl1" ] : [ w e %  a r e %  s t i l l %  s i c k %  t o d a y ] > # ;
< [ b e %  s t i l l %  s i c k %  t o d a y "+V" "+I" "+Ipfv" "+SbjPl2" ] : [ y o u %  a l l %  a r e %  s t i l l %  s i c k %  t o d a y ] > # ;
< [ b e %  s t i l l %  s i c k %  t o d a y "+V" "+I" "+Ipfv" "+SbjPl3" ] : [ t h e y %  a r e %  s t i l l %  s i c k %  t o d a y ] > # ;
< [ b e %  s t i l l %  s i c k %  t o d a y "+V" "+I" "+Ipfv" "+SbjSg4" ] : [ s o m e o n e %  i s %  s t i l l %  s i c k %  t o d a y ] > # ;
< [ b e %  s i c k %  a g a i n %  t o d a y "+V" "+I" "+Ipfv" "+SbjSg1" ] : [ I %  a m %  s i c k %  a g a i n %  t o d a y ] > # ;
< [ b e %  s i c k %  a g a i n %  t o d a y "+V" "+I" "+Ipfv" "+SbjSg2" ] : [ y o u %  a r e %  s i c k %  a g a i n %  t o d a y ] > # ;
< [ b e %  s i c k %  a g a i n %  t o d a y "+V" "+I" "+Ipfv" "+SbjSg3" ] : [ [ h e | s h e ] %  i s %  s i c k %  a g a i n %  t o d a y ] > # ;
< [ b e %  s i c k %  a g a i n %  t o d a y "+V" "+I" "+Ipfv" "+SbjPl1" ] : [ w e %  a r e %  s i c k %  a g a i n %  t o d a y ] > # ;
< [ b e %  s i c k %  a g a i n %  t o d a y "+V" "+I" "+Ipfv" "+SbjPl2" ] : [ y o u %  a l l %  a r e %  s i c k %  a g a i n %  t o d a y ] > # ;
